apertium-eng.eng.dix
    <pardef n="t/ake__v">
      <e><p><l>ake</l><r>ake<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>akes</l><r>ake<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ook</l><r>ake<s n="v"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aken</l><r>ake<s n="v"/><s n="pstp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aking</l><r>ake<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prog"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="br/ing__v">
      <e><p><l>ing</l><r>ing<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ings</l><r>ing<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ought</l><r>ing<s n="v"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aking</l><r>ing<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prog"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ca/tch__v">
      <e><p><l>tch</l><r>tch<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tches</l><r>tch<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aught</l><r>tch<s n="v"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tching</l><r>tch<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prog"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="f/ind__v">
      <e><p><l>ind</l><r>ind<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inds</l><r>ind<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ound</l><r>ind<s n="v"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nding</l><r>ind<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prog"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="le/ave__v">
      <e><p><l>ave</l><r>ave<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aves</l><r>ave<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ft</l><r>ave<s n="v"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aving</l><r>ave<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prog"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="c/ome__v">
      <e><p><l>ome</l><r>ome<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>omes</l><r>ome<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ame</l><r>ome<s n="v"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oming</l><r>ome<s n="v"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prog"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="bring"><i>br</i><par n="br/ing__v"/></e>
    <e lm="catch"><i>ca</i><par n="ca/tch__v"/></e>
    <e lm="come"><i>c</i><par n="c/ome__v"/></e>
    <e lm="find"><i>f</i><par n="f/ind__v"/></e>
    <e lm="leave"><i>le</i><par n="le/ave__v"/></e>
    <e lm="take"><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__v"/></e>
